Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-679
Roadway; removal of dead or injured persons; peace officer.

Peace officers may remove a dead body or an injured person from any roadway to the nearest available position off the roadway as may be necessary to keep the roadway open or safe for public travel or to any hospital, clinic, or medical doctor as may be necessary to preserve life.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 84;

Laws 1978, LB 593, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 376, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-684;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 175.

Effect of section on alcohol-related offenses, see section 53-1,120.